Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 3 District Courts

Cross references. —

As to when district court shall hear a case appealed from the circuit court de novo, see §

5-9-141

.

As to judicial nominating commission and filling vacancy on district court, see art. 5, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to district courts generally, see art. 5, §§ 10 to 21, Wyo. Const.

As to exclusive original jurisdiction of all matters relating to probate and contest of wills and testaments, see §

2-2-101

.

For duty of district court relative to delinquent and dependent children generally, see §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

.

For authority of district court relative to appointments to fill vacancies in county board of commissioners, see §

18-3-524

.

As to county courthouses and jails generally, see chapter 6 of title 18.

As to election of district judges at general election and as to term of office, see §

22-2-105

.

As to nonpartisan primary election of judiciary, see §§

22-5-203

and

22-5-205

.

As to filling district court vacancies, see §

22-18-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 1 et seq.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 105; 48A C.J.S. Judges §§ 12 to 34.